Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF26.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1317YH (1) 91 je/js H.F. 26 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 91A.5B Treatment of adoptive parent 1 employees. 2 1. For purposes of this section, âadoptionâ means the 3 permanent placement in this state of a child by the department 4 of health and human services, by a licensed agency under 5 chapter 238, by an agency that meets the provisions of the 6 interstate compact in section 232.158, or by a person making an 7 independent placement according to the provisions of chapter 8 600. 9 2. An employer shall treat an employee who chooses to adopt 10 a child up to six years of age in the same manner as an employee 11 who is the biological parent of a newborn child for purposes of 12 employment policies, benefits, and protections for the first 13 year of the adoption. 14 3. Notwithstanding subsection 2, an employee shall not be 15 entitled to disability leave without a qualifying disability 16 under an employerâs disability policies. 17